Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 7.1 The Paul W. Crowley Rhode Island Student Investment Initiative [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-7.1-15.
The Paul W. Crowley Rhode Island student investment initiative.

Each locally or regionally operated school district shall receive as a base the same amount of school aid as each district received in fiscal year 1997-1998, adjusted to reflect the increases or decreases in aid enacted to meet the minimum and maximum funding levels established for FY 2000 through FY 2008. Each school district shall also receive school aid through each investment fund for which that district qualifies pursuant to §§

16-7.1-8

,

16-7.1-9

,

16-7.1-10

,

16-7.1-11

,

16-7.1-12

,

16-7.1-16

and

16-7.1-19

. These sums shall be in addition to the base amount described in this section. For FY 2009 and FY 2010, the reference year for the data used in the calculation of aid pursuant to §

16-7.1-8

, §

16-7.1-9

, §

16-7.1-10

, §

16-7.1-11

, §

16-7.1-11.1

, §

16-7.1-12

, §

16-7.1-16

, §

16-7.1-19

and

16-77.1-2(b)

shall be FY 2004. Calculation and distribution of education aid under §§

16-5-31

,

16-5-32

,

16-7-20

,

16-7-20

.5,

16-7-34.2

,

16-7-34.3

,

16-24-6

,

16-54-4

, and

16-67-4

is hereby suspended. Provided, however, calculation and distribution of education aid under § 16-7.1-10 is suspended for FY 2009 and FY 2010. School districts may continue to maintain professional development programs and may reduce other education programs to achieve savings during FY 2009 and FY 2010. The funding of the purposes and activities of chapter 67 of this title, the Rhode Island Literacy and Dropout Prevention Act of 1967, shall be the same amount of the base amount of each district funded for that purpose in fiscal year 1997-1998. In addition each district shall expend three percent (3%) of its student equity and early childhood funds under the provisions of chapter 67 of this title.

Funding for full day kindergarten programs in accordance with §

16-7.1-11.1

shall be in addition to funding received under this section.

Funding distributed under §§

16-77.1-2(b)

and

16-64-1.1

shall be in addition to funding distributed under this section.

For FY 2009, aid to school districts shall be reduced by the equivalent savings that are realized due to a reduction of payments to the teachers’ retirement system. The reduction for the Chariho regional school district shall be prorated among the member communities. In addition, for FY 2009 aid to school districts shall be reduced by any amount of previously appropriated school housing aid determined to be ineligible for reimbursement in accordance with §

16-7-44.2

. For FY 2009 aid shall also be reduced by the amount of projected revenue for the period December 1, 2008 through June 30, 2009 from the permanent school fund. The projected revenue shall be determined by annualizing actual earnings from the period May 12, 2008 through November 30, 2008. The department of elementary and secondary education shall reduce aid in two equal installments, payable in May and June; provided however, that East Providence shall receive one payment of reduced aid in May.

For FY 2009, aid to school districts shall include thirty eight million, three hundred twenty-four thousand, eight hundred twenty-two dollars ($38,324,822) from federal fiscal stabilization funds offset by a like reduction from general revenues. The distribution shall be in the same proportion as general operating aid.

Districts shall comply with the assurances and reporting requirements provided in the federal guidance for the (ARRA) allocation and by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

There shall be an appropriation to ensure that total aid distributed to communities in FY 2010 under this section and §§

16-7.1-11.1

,

16-64-1.1

and

16-77.1-2(b)

and excluding any FY 2009 Stabilization reappropriations shall be as follows:

In addition to the amounts listed above, the department of elementary and secondary education shall allocate monthly to each school district all funds received into the permanent school fund pursuant to §

42-61.2-7

, as amended by chapter 13 of the 2008 Public Laws entitled “An Act Relating to State Affairs and Government”, up to $14.1 million, in the same proportion as the aid distribution in the FY 2009 enacted appropriations act.

This special provision shall not limit entitlements as determined by application of other formula provisions in this section.

For FY 2009 payments to charter public schools shall be reduced by the equivalent savings that are realized due to a reduction of payments to the teachers’ retirement system. The reduction for district sponsored charter schools shall be incorporated in the sponsoring school district’s aid as noted in subsection (f). Aid to charter public schools shall be reduced in the April quarterly payment. For FY 2009, charter public school funding is as follows:

Beacon Charter School1,512,785

Blackstone Academy1,469,349

Compass614,485

Paul Cuffee4,449,006

CVS Highlander2,596,782

International2,863,818

Kingston Hill Academy736,784

Learning Community3,669,529

NE Laborer's1,508,866

Textron2,361,370

Times 2 Academy6,870,410

For FY 2010, payments to charter public schools shall be reduced by the equivalent savings that are realized due to a reduction of payments to the teachers’ retirement system. The reduction for district sponsored charter schools shall be incorporated in the sponsoring schools district’s aid as noted in subsection (f). For FY 2010, payments to charter public schools shall be reduced by one million four hundred sixty-three thousand three hundred sixty-seven dollars ($1,463,367) based on the charter schools’ share of total FY 2009 enacted education aid, including school districts and state schools. For FY 2010, a distribution of stabilization funds per the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act (ARRA) totaling one million four hundred seventy-one thousand eighty-seven dollars ($1,471,087) shall be allocated to charter public schools proportionately based on their share of total FY 2009 enacted education aid, including school districts and state schools.

For FY 2010, payments to charter public schools shall be further reduced by one million one hundred fifty-eight thousand one dollars ($1,158,001) based on the charter schools’ share of total FY 2010 originally enacted education aid. For FY 2010, an additional distribution of stabilization funds per the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act (ARRA) totaling one hundred ninety-seven thousand seven hundred fifty-two dollars ($197,752) shall be allocated to charter public schools proportionately based on their share of total FY 2010 originally enacted education aid.

Public charter schools shall comply with the assurances and reporting requirements provided in the federal guidance for the (ARRA) allocation and by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

There shall be deducted from the final aid payment to each school district any amounts owed to the state at the end of the fiscal year for transportation of the district’s students under the statewide transportation system established pursuant to R.I.G.L.

16-21.1-7

and

16-21.1-8

. Districts shall receive monthly invoices summarizing the basis of the transportation fees charged. Any such deductions in aid shall be transferred to the statewide student transportation services restricted receipt account.

The provisions of R.I.G.L.

16-26-7.1

notwithstanding, districts shall be assessed tuition to cover the costs of educational services that are additional to the core deaf and hard of hearing education program that is provided to resident students at the Rhode Island School for the Deaf. This tuition shall be based on a graduated tuition schedule that is based on the varying needs of students. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and implement the schedule. Districts shall receive monthly invoices summarizing the basis for the tuition charged. There shall be deducted from the final aid payment to each school district at the end of the fiscal year any amounts owed to the state for these additional educational services.

Children with disabilities. (1) Based on its review of special education within the context of Rhode Island school reform, the general assembly recommends addressing the needs of all children and preventing disability through scientific research based, as described in the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, Title 1, Part B, Section 1208 [20 U.S.C. § 6368], reading instruction and the development of Personal Literacy Programs for students in the early grades performing below grade level in reading and implement a system of student accountability that will enable the state to track individual students over time. Additionally, the department of elementary and secondary education must provide districts with rigorous criteria and procedures for identifying students with learning disabilities and speech/language impairments. Additional study is required of factors that influence programming for students with low incidence disabilities; those with disabilities that severely compromise life functions; and programming for students with disabilities through urban special education. Alternatives for funding special education require examination.

(2)

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish any advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the general assembly and its agents that is deemed necessary or desirable by the study to facilitate the purposes of this section.

For FY 2011, aid to school districts shall be reduced by the equivalent savings that are realized due to a reduction of payments to the teachers’ retirement system. The reduction for the Chariho regional school district shall be prorated among the member communities. For FY 2011, aid to school districts shall be further reduced by twenty million four hundred ninety thousand one hundred thirty-seven dollars ($20,490,137) from the FY 2010 originally enacted level based on the school district’s share of total FY 2010 originally enacted education aid, including aid to state schools and charter schools. For FY 2011, a distribution of federal stabilization funds made available through the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act (ARRA), in the amount of seventeen million four hundred thirty-one thousand nine hundred four dollars ($17,431,904), shall be allocated to school districts proportionately based on their share of total FY 2010 originally enacted education aid, including aid to state schools and charter schools.

There shall be an appropriation to ensure that total aid distributed to communities in FY 2011 under this section and §§

16-7.1-11.1

,

16-64-1.1

and

16-77.1-2(b)

, excluding any FY 2009 and FY 2010 Stabilization reappropriations, shall be as follows:

In addition to the amounts listed above, the department of elementary and secondary education shall allocate monthly to each school district all funds received into the permanent school fund pursuant to §

42-61.2-7

, as amended by chapter 13 of the 2008 Public Laws entitled “An Act Relating to State Affairs and Government”, up to $14.1 million, in the same proportion as the aid distribution in the FY 2009 enacted appropriations act.

This special provision shall not limit entitlements as determined by application of other formula provisions in this section.

For FY 2009 payments to charter public schools shall be reduced by the equivalent savings that are realized due to a reduction of payments to the teachers’ retirement system. The reduction for district sponsored charter schools shall be incorporated in the sponsoring school district’s aid as noted in subsection (g). Aid to charter public schools shall be reduced in the April quarterly payment. For FY 2009, charter public school funding is as follows:

Beacon Charter School1,512,785

Blackstone Academy1,469,349

Compass614,485

Paul Cuffee4,449,006

CVS Highlander2,596,782

International2,863,818

Kingston Hill Academy736,784

Learning Community3,669,529

NE Laborer's1,508,866

Textron2,361,370

Times 2 Academy6,870,410

For FY 2011, payments to charter public schools shall be reduced by the equivalent savings that are realized due to a reduction of payments to the teachers’ retirement system. The reduction for district sponsored charter schools shall be incorporated in the sponsoring schools district’s aid as noted in subsection (g). For FY 2011, payments to charter public schools shall be further reduced by one million seventy-six thousand nine hundred forty-one dollars ($1,076,941) from the FY 2010 originally enacted education aid based on the charter schools’ share of total FY 2010 enacted education aid, including aid to school districts and state schools. For FY 2011, a distribution of federal stabilization funds made available through the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act (ARRA), in the amount of one million forty-eight thousand six hundred dollars ($1,048,600), shall be allocated to charter public schools proportionately based on their share of total FY 2010 originally enacted education aid, including aid to school districts and state schools.

FY 2010 Stimulus Fiscal Stabilization General Revenues Allocation Barrington 1,629,678 170,513 Burrillville 12,220,612 948,730 Charlestown 1,590,767 134,864 Coventry 16,912,980 1,365,674 Cranston 29,622,695 2,410,080 Cumberland 11,066,294 900,586 East Greenwich 1,321,451 129,312 East Providence 23,047,872 1,833,360 Foster 1,208,609 96,527 Glocester 2,754,277 219,128 Hopkinton 5,323,835 425,441 Jamestown 356,229 35,124 Johnston 8,971,463 730,358 Lincoln 5,884,774 499,702 Little Compton 267,222 24,622 Middletown 8,937,990 715,319 Narragansett 1,314,267 125,872 Newport 10,104,222 808,465 New Shoreham 50,323 6,826 North Kingstown 9,922,498 813,392 North Providence 11,311,934 911,004 North Smithfield 4,055,880 328,814 Pawtucket 58,731,451 4,584,707 Portsmouth 5,571,674 454,416 Providence 168,378,347 13,241,031 Richmond 5,300,144 422,147 Scituate 2,712,604 229,942 Smithfield 4,635,136 388,414 South Kingstown 8,575,177 714,097 Tiverton 4,923,363 402,699 Warwick 31,261,607 2,554,650 Westerly 5,319,551 460,458 West Warwick 17,635,159 1,395,236 Woonsocket 41,636,569 3,244,945 Bristol-Warren 17,675,687 1,395,455 Exeter-West Greenwich. 6,378,147 515,945 Chariho 359,704 27,370 Foster-Glocester 4,878,574 390,339 Central Falls 40,233,714 3,021,611

Click to view

FY 2011 Stimulus Fiscal FY 2011 Stabilization General Revenues Allocation Barrington 1,712,863 64,829 Burrillville 12,736,916 312,396 Charlestown 1,661,061 47,203 Coventry 17,646,066 460,504 Cranston 30,913,084 816,662 Cumberland 11,548,713 304,926 East Greenwich 1,280,422 47,289 East Providence 23,918,627 613,330 Foster 1,260,670 32,351 Glocester 2,872,692 73,308 Hopkinton 5,553,441 142,447 Jamestown 373,817 13,029 Johnston 9,362,199 247,456 Lincoln 6,147,563 173,114 Little Compton 279,764 8,806 Middletown 9,323,001 239,745 Narragansett 1,377,507 46,177 Newport 10,540,392 271,661 New Shoreham 53,292 2,789 North Kingstown 10,356,579 276,550 North Providence 11,800,998 306,546 North Smithfield 4,231,887 110,796 Pawtucket 61,226,793 1,516,531 Portsmouth 5,828,378 154,719 Providence 175,422,098 4,405,942 Richmond 5,528,422 140,975 Scituate 2,833,854 79,668 Smithfield 4,765,663 133,614 South Kingstown 8,953,748 244,944 Tiverton 5,138,483 136,740 Warwick 32,626,231 867,483 Westerly 5,560,097 161,207 West Warwick 18,390,194 465,058 Woonsocket 43,284,016 1,072,017 Bristol-Warren 18,431,734 464,709 Exeter-West Greenwich. 6,534,833 174,116 Chariho 374,768 8,899 Foster-Glocester 5,089,030 130,915 Central Falls 39,893,956 971,688

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 23, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 21, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 38, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 5, § 1.

16-7.1-16.
Targeted school aid.

In addition to those funds described in §

16-7.1-15

, each district with a tax effort index below 1.0 as calculated pursuant to §

16-7.1-6

and with a free and reduced lunch count in grades K-3 greater than forty percent (40%) shall receive targeted school aid. Districts shall be eligible for aid based on the proportion that their average daily membership bears to the total average daily membership of districts eligible for aid under this section. The local school district shall determine the amount it proposes to spend on the program priorities referred to in this section and the programs and proposed expenditures shall be a part of the district’s strategic plan and/or annual updates required under §

16-7.1-2

.

The commissioner may require a school district to reserve up to five percent (5%) of its targeted aid for intervention remedies. These five percent (5%) set-aside funds shall only be spent with the prior approval of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. If however by March 1, the amount reserved is not expended or expected to be spent in the academic year, then the district may expend the funds in accordance with the priorities of this section and with the approval of the commissioner. In addition, there shall be an appropriation for comprehensive on-site school reviews and other accountability measures that the commission deems appropriate in accordance with policies and procedures to be determined by the commissioner and to carry out the purposes of §

16-7.1-2

. The commissioner may give priority to districts receiving targeted funds for the use of this appropriation.

Districts may use targeted funds in new or expanded programs for:

Early childhood education;

Helping schools to improve instruction to meet high standards;

Reducing class size at the elementary level;

After school programming for middle schools, junior, and senior high schools in accordance with §

16-7.1-17

;

Establishing and implementing innovative organizations and methods of instruction at the middle, junior high, and/or high school levels;

Child opportunity zones;

Teacher mentoring;

Curriculum revision to meet new standards;

School and district intervention; or

Other programs which the commissioner believes will result in increased student performance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 1.

16-7.1-17.
Urban after-school programs.

There is hereby established an after-school program for middle schools and junior and senior high schools to be administered by the department of elementary and secondary education.

Each district receiving targeted funds under this section must use a portion of these funds to establish programs as defined in this section at the middle or junior high school level and may establish a program at the senior high school level. Each program shall be located in or near middle schools or junior or senior high schools in school districts identified as “at risk” by the legislature in accordance with §

16-7.1-16

and which have an equity index below one. The purpose of the programs is to provide students an opportunity to engage in a gainful activity, such as an athletic, cultural, arts, academic, community service, remediation, and/or career exploration activity after-school or during the time the schools are not in session. Districts may contract for services with programs that meet board of regents standards. The commissioner may require that districts that receive targeted funds establish these programs either district-wide or at an individual school within the district. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the commissioner from interpreting middle or junior high school to mean middle or junior high school age.

The department of elementary and secondary education is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and monitoring of the programs for providing any assistance to plan and design the programs, and for annually performing an evaluation of the overall quality of the after-school programs. Qualifying school districts will be required to submit a plan and other reports as may be requested relating to the use of the after-school program funds to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 31, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 383, § 1.

16-7.1-18.
Investment funds — Funding.

Funding of the investment funds enumerated in §

16-7.1-6

,

16-7.1-8

,

16-7.1-9

,

16-7.1-10

,

16-7.1-11

, and

16-7.1-12

shall be by funds set aside from the state operations aid to be provided to school districts in the same manner as funds set aside and provided to school districts pursuant to chapter 67 of this title for literacy programs. The amount to be set aside will be that amount designated for each investment fund in the state budget as enacted. The funds thus set aside and provided to school districts shall be used for the purposes required by the terms of §§

16-7.1-6

,

16-7.1-8

, and

16-7.1-9

. The fund thus set aside and provided to school districts shall be restricted to be used for the purposes required by the terms of §§

16-7.1-10

,

16-7.1-11

, and

16-7.1-12

. The full set aside amount will be available for use by the school district. Use of this set aside amount must be based on the strategic plan required to be submitted by local school districts to the department of elementary and secondary education by chapter 7.1 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 23, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 2.

16-7.1-19.
Vocational technical equity fund.

The general assembly recognizes the need to support the academic instruction component of vocational education for students enrolled in career and technical education programs. To accomplish this, the general assembly shall appropriate some sum per student for each student who attends a locally operated career and technical center based on the enrollments reported to the department of elementary and secondary education for the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16

. The sum shall be five hundred dollars ($500) per student. Funding under this section will be limited to those students enrolled in programs that are part of the career and technical education system as approved by the department of elementary and secondary education.

For fiscal year 2007, aid received pursuant to this section shall be equal to aid received in the fiscal year 2006 enacted by the 2005 general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 9, § 8; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 9.